Wyoming statutes. Title 37 Public Utilities
Article 1. Generally

§ 37-8-101.
[Renumbered.]

Renumbered as §

31-18-101

by Laws 1993, ch. 68, § 3.

Cross references. —

For present provisions concerning commercial vehicles, see §

31-18-101

.

§ 37-8-102.
[Renumbered.]

Renumbered as §

31-18-102

by Laws 1993, ch. 68, § 4.

Editor's notes. —

Section

31-18-102

was repealed by Laws 1998, ch. 46, § 2.

§§ 37-8-103 and 37-8-104.
[Renumbered.]

Renumbered as §§

31-18-103

and

31-18-104

by Laws 1993, ch. 68, § 3.

Cross references. —

For present provisions concerning exemptions and powers and duties of the department, see §§

31-18-103

and

31-18-104

.

§§ 37-8-105 through 37-8-125.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1983, ch. 140, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

See note catchlined “Revision of chapter” at beginning of chapter.

These sections, which derived from Laws 1935, ch. 65, §§ 61, 63, 66; Laws 1937, ch. 121, §§ 5, 8, 27, 29; Laws 1947, ch. 32, § 3; Laws 1957, ch. 164, § 7; Laws 1961, ch. 224, §§ 1, 2; Laws 1967, ch. 128, §§ 1 to 7; Laws 1969, ch. 217, § 3, related to identification cards and plates, routes and rates, operating times, and registration of motor carrier vehicles.